Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3601
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-3601 to 48-3609 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 1.